Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201868-1120
Funding; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the costs for staff, operations, and state aid necessary to carry out the Aging and Disability Resource Center Act be funded from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for fiscal years 2018-19 and 2019-20.

Laws 2018, LB793, § 9.
April 24, 2018